Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-218
School board and governing authority; immunization clinics; request assistance.

Any school board or board of education of a school district or the governing authority of a private, denominational, or parochial school in this state may request assistance from the Department of Health and Human Services in establishing immunization clinics. Such assistance shall consist of vaccines, serums, and other supplies, services, and guidance from the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1973, LB 173, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-444.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 22;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 812;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 64;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 708.